Utah statutes.
9-4-907.   Disclosure of interest.
(1)  Any trustee, officer, or employee of the corporation who has, will have,
or later acquires an interest, direct or indirect, in any transaction with the
corporation shall immediately disclose the nature and extent of that interest
in writing to the corporation as soon as he has knowledge of the actual or
prospective interest.
(2) (a)  This disclosure shall be entered upon the minutes of the corporation.
(b)  Upon the disclosure, that trustee, officer, or employee may participate
in any action by the corporation authorizing the transaction.
